src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessorindices.lexc
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-NomSg-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}м%{ое%}к _LAK-NomSg-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-linking-vowel+Dial/NW:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%^NoLinkVowм%{ое%}к _LAK-NomSg-Conjugation ;
!+Err/Orth-no-linking-vowel
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-NomSg-Conjugation ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-NomSg-Conjugation ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PX
 PL-GEN-PXSG1 ;
 PL-GEN-PXSG2 ;
 PL-GEN-PXSG3 ;
 PL-GEN-PXPL1 ;
 PL-GEN-PXPL2 ;
 PL-GEN-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
!CLT/COP4_OBL-SC3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL1
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст MUTUAL-OBL-CONJUGATION-NO-3Pers ;


LEXICON PL-NOM-PX
 PL-NOM-PXSG1 ;
 PL-NOM-PXSG2 ;
 PL-NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-NOM-PXPL1 ;
 PL-NOM-PXPL2 ;
 PL-NOM-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-NomPl-Conjugation-4Poss ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL-K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL-K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL-K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL1
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Cop+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст CLT/COP_PL-MUTUAL ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PX@@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст K ;



!! ## POSSESSIVE TAGS 



!LEXICON N_KAL-Poss-Declension-PossX
! N-Poss-Declension-PossX_01 ;

!LEXICON N_OSH-Poss-Declension-PossX
! N-Poss-Declension-PossX_01 ;

!LEXICON N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-PossX
!! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
!! NonNomSg
! N-Poss-Declension-PossX_01 ;

LEXICON N-Poss-Declension-PossX_01
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Sg3@+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@U.PossPx.Sg3@%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@+PxPl1:@U.PossPx.Pl1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@+PxPl2:@U.PossPx.Pl2@%>%{оеэØ%}нк _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;
@U.PossPx.Pl3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:@U.PossPx.Pl3@%>%{оеэØ%}ск _KUDO-Tenses1-4Inf ;


!LEXICON Possessive-NomGen
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}з%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}м{ое%}к _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses-NomPl ;
!+Gen+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Possessives2-PxSg1
+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}м _KAL-Determinatives1 ;
+PxSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} _KAL-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Possessives2-PxSg2
+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%} _KIT-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Possessives2-PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Determinatives1 ;
+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} K ; !2013-04-15!
+PxSg3+Clt/Cop:%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ; !2013-04-15!

+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} K ; !2013-04-15!
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3+Clt/Cop:%>%{оеэØ%}нд%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ; !2013-04-15!
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} K ; !2013-04-15!
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3+Clt/Cop:%>%{оеэØ%}ндз%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ; !2013-04-15!

LEXICON Possessives2-PxPl1
+PxPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Possessives2-PxPl2
+PxPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}нк _LAK-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Possessives2-PxPl3
+PxPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}ст _KIT-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:%>ск _LAK-Determinatives1 ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:%>нст _KIT-Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Possessive-Before-K-noArrow
+PxSg1:н%{ЬØ%} K ;
+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE:м K ;
+PxSg2:т%{ЬØ%} K ;
+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W:нт%{ЬØ%} K ;
+PxSg3:нз%{оэØ%} K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:нд%{оэØ%} K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+PxSg3:ндз%{оэØ%} K ;
+PxPl1:н%{оеэ%}к K-lak ;
+PxPl2:нк K-lak ;
+PxPl3:ст K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+PxPl3:ск K ;

LEXICON SPATIAL_DEFECTIVES_ABL/LAT/LOC/PRL
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1%>нть K ;
+SP+Lat+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}в K ;
+SP+Loc+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%} K ;
+Sg+Loc+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}%>нть K ;!алость ботужалекс
+SP+Loc:%>%{оеэØ%} OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
+SP+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а K ;
+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а%>нть K ;
+SP+Prl:%>Г2а OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;

LEXICON OBL_PX/DEF_FOLLOWED_BY_END/FOC/COP_OR_K
 OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
 K ;
+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;
!defective noun in def удало+N+Loc+Def: удалонть
!2022-04-07: CLT/COP-4-OBL ;

LEXICON OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG1 ;
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG2 ;
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG3 ;
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL1 ;
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL2 ;
 OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL3 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG1
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG1 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG1 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG2
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG2 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG2 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXSG3
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG3 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG3 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL1
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL1 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL1 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL2
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL2 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL2 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END/FOC/CLTCOP_PXPL3
OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL3 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL3 ;

!!
LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP-OR-FOC
 K ;
 OBL-PX4-CLTCOP ;
!LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP-OR-ILL
!@U.CX.ILL@+Ill:@U.CX.ILL@%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX4-CLTCOP ;
! OBL-PX4-CLTCOP ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-CLTCOP !ськамонзо:ськамо
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG1 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG2 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXSG3 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL1 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL2 ;
OBL-PX4-CLTCOP_PXPL3 ;

!!

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC
 OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
! K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC
!! word boundary or focus
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG1 ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG2 ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG3 ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL1 ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL2 ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXPL3 ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG1
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}н%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Dial/SE+PxSg1:@U.PossPx.Sg1@%>%{оеэØ%}м K ;

LEXICON OBL-PX4-END-FOC_PXSG2
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%} K ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+PxSg2:@U.PossPx.Sg2@%>%{оеэØ%}нт%{ЬØ%}  K ;
